Louisiana, session 2026, HB894.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2481.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2481.8. City of Alexandria; public safety officer
A. The governing authority of the city of Alexandria may create, by
ordinance, the position of public safety officer within the fire department. A public
safety officer is a fire department employee who shall perform both firefighting and
police duties.
B.(1) To be eligible for appointment as a public safety officer, an employee
shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Current employment and good standing within the fire department.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-790 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 894
(b) Hold a rank below captain.
(c) Authorization by the appointing authority to perform police work.
(d) Successful completion of a normal background investigation and any
psychometric, psychological, or other medical or physical examinations for police
officers in the city of Alexandria.
(e) Successful completion of all firefighter training and certification
requirements.
(f) Successful completion of all police officer training requirements as
mandated by the Council on Peace Officer Standards and Training.
(g) Successful completion of a comprehensive dual-role training program
approved by the fire chief and chief of police.
(2) Only the fire chief may recommend an employee to the appointing
authority to be a candidate for public safety officer.
(3) The chief of police may reject any candidate who is recommended for
appointment as a public safety officer.
(4) All public safety officers shall maintain current certifications and
participate in ongoing professional development as required by both the fire
department and police department.
C.(1) Fire department employees may perform all duties of a firefighter and,
upon appointment as a public safety officer, all duties of a police officer, including
but not limited to law enforcement, emergency medical response, rescue operations,
and community safety initiatives.
(2) A fire department employee shall exercise police powers only when
appointed as a public safety officer and shall perform all duties in accordance with
police department policies.
(3) Public safety officers shall comply with operational protocols and
reporting requirements of the fire department and police department in which they
are serving.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-790 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 894
D.(1) Public safety officers shall be subject to the civil service rules and
regulations applicable to the fire department.
(2) Any allegations of misconduct or violations of departmental policies
shall be investigated under the applicable civil service rules of the fire department,
with input from officials of both the fire department and police department as
necessary.
(3) The chief of police may determine that a public safety officer shall no
longer perform police duties, subject to a written joint policy between the fire
department and police department.
E.(1) The fire chief and chief of police shall jointly develop and approve
training standards, operational guidelines, and performance metrics for public safety
officers.
(2) The fire chief and chief of police shall jointly submit for approval to the
fire and police civil service board a proposed dual role training curriculum and
operational guidelines no later than ninety days after the effective date of this
Section.
(3) All necessary amendments to departmental policies and fire and police
civil service rules shall be promulgated no later than one hundred eighty days after
the effective date of this Section.
(4) Oversight of public safety officers conduct, certifications, and
assignments shall be maintained through regular audits, joint supervisory meetings,
and annual reviews conducted by the fire and police civil service board.
F.(1) Fire department employees shall retain their rank and seniority in the
fire department, regardless of an appointment as a public safety officer.
(2) Service as a public safety officer shall not constitute a break in service
or adversely affect promotional eligibility or seniority accrual within the fire
department.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-790 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 894